Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.930

State fire protection services—Intent.

The legislature finds that fire protection services at the state level are provided by different, independent state agencies. This has resulted in a lack of a comprehensive state-level focus for state fire protection services, funding, and policy. The legislature further finds that the paramount duty of the state in fire protection services is to enhance the capacity of all local jurisdictions to assure that their personnel with fire suppression, prevention, inspection, origin and cause, and arson investigation responsibilities are adequately trained to discharge their responsibilities. It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate fire protection services into a single state agency. It is also the intent of the legislature that the fire protection services program created herein will assist local fire protection agencies in program development without encroaching upon their historic autonomy. It is the further intent of the legislature that the fire protection services program be implemented incrementally to assure a smooth transition, to build local, regional, and state capacity, and to avoid undue burdens on jurisdictions with limited resources.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 44; 1995 c 369 s 14; 1993 c 280 s 68; 1986 c 266 s 54. Formerly RCW 43.63A.300.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Application—1995 c 369: "This act does not apply to forest fire service personnel and programs." [ 1995 c 369 s 70.]

Effective date—1995 c 369: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 369 s 72.]

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

State fire protection: Chapter 43.44 RCW.